Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.130

Contractors—Debarment, sanctions—Notice of violation. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) For the purposes of enforcing this chapter, if a contractor has substantially identical operations, corporate, or management structure to another entity that has been debarred or otherwise sanctioned under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.055, 39.12.065, or any associated rule, then the contractor is subject to the same debarment or sanction as that other entity. These sanctions include: Penalties issued under this chapter; findings of violations that the department of labor and industries count toward a bar on bidding on public works; and debarment, prohibiting bidding on public works. The department of labor and industries may enforce this section under the enforcement provisions of this chapter and associated rules.

(2) The director may issue a notice of violation under this section to a contractor described in subsection (1) of this section to extend the sanctions of a debarred or sanctioned entity imposed through a final and binding order or agreement to the contractor. A hearing must be held following a timely appeal of the notice of violation in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The director shall issue a written determination including his or her findings after the hearing unless a notice of violation is not timely appealed. A notice of violation not timely appealed is final and binding, and is not subject to further appeal.

[ 2024 c 7 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 7: "The legislature finds that government contracts should not be awarded to those that knowingly and intentionally violate Washington state's prevailing wage laws. The legislature also finds that businesses that follow the law and pay workers appropriately are placed at a competitive disadvantage to those that reduce costs by failing to pay prevailing wages or failing to file or falsely file with the Washington state department of labor and industries or sanctioned under RCW 39.12.055. In order to create a consistent, fair playing field for businesses and avoid taxpayer contracts going to those that repeatedly violate the law and illegally withhold money from workers, the state should amend the state prevailing wage laws to extend those businesses' sanctions to their substantially identical companies. These sanctions include penalties issued under chapter 39.12 RCW; findings of violations that the department of labor and industries count toward a bar on bidding on public works; and debarment, prohibiting bidding on public works." [ 2024 c 7 s 1.]

Effective date—2024 c 7: See note following RCW 39.12.010.